District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.41

Definitions.

(a)

“Council” shall mean the Council of the District of Columbia.

(b)

“Legislative duties” shall include the responsibilities of each member of the Council in the exercise of such member’s functions as a legislative representative, including but not limited to: Everything said, written or done during legislative sessions, meetings, or investigations of the Council or any committee of the Council, and everything said, written, or done in the process of drafting and publishing legislation and legislative reports.

(c)

“Threatening letter or communication” shall mean any letter or communication which reasonably indicates an earnest intention or determination to inflict injury upon someone or something of value.

History

June 8, 1976, D.C. Law 1-65, § 2, 22 DCR 7150

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-222.
1973 Ed., § 1-141a.